Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2440
Immunosuppressant drug; accepted or dispensed; conditions.

(1) An immunosuppressant drug shall only be accepted or dispensed under the program if such drug is in its original, unopened, sealed, and tamper-evident packaging. An immunosuppressant drug packaged in single unit doses may be accepted and dispensed if the outside packaging is opened but the single-unit-dose packaging is unopened. There shall be no limitation on the number of doses that can be donated to the program as long as the donated drugs meet the requirements of this section.

(2) An immunosuppressant drug shall not be accepted or dispensed under the program if (a) such drug bears an expiration date prior to the date of donation or (b) such drug is adulterated or misbranded as described in section 71-2401 or 71-2402.

(3) Subject to limitations provided in this section, unused immunosuppressant drugs dispensed under the medical assistance program may be accepted and dispensed under the immunosuppressant drug repository program.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 46.